Utah statutes.
53B-16-106.   Board to establish electronics engineering program at Weber State University.

(1)  The board shall approve a proposal submitted by Weber State University, in accordance with Section 53B-16-102 and board policy, to establish a bachelor of science degree program in electronics engineering.

(2)  Weber State University shall establish the program described in Subsection (1) within existing budgets and with no additional appropriation.

